Utah statutes.
77-6-7.   Trial on denial or refusal to answer -- Procedure.
If the defendant denies the accusation or refuses to answer or appear, the
court shall proceed to try the accusation. The rights of the parties and
procedures used shall be the same as in any civil proceeding.
